Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1335.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [171.085] ELECTRONIC DRIVER'S LICENSE. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators. new text end new text begin (c) "Credential" means a learner's permit, driver's license, or Minnesota identification card issued under this chapter. new text end new text begin (d) "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a physical or electronic credential is issued. new text end new text begin (e) "Data element" means a distinct component of an individual's information that is found in the individual's customer record with DVS. new text end new text begin (f) "DVS" means the Department of Public Safety Driver and Vehicle Services Division. new text end new text begin (g) "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of a physical credential issued by DVS that conveys identity and driving privilege information and complies with AAMVA's Mobile Driver's License Implementation Guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard. new text end new text begin (h) "Physical credential" means a document issued by DVS under this chapter that conveys identity and driving privilege information and complies with AAMVA's Card Design Standard. new text end new text begin (i) "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic credential onto a credential holder's device. new text end new text begin (j) "Relying party" means an entity to which the credential holder is presenting an electronic credential. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Development; rulemaking. new text end new text begin (a) DVS may contract with one or more entities to develop an electronic credential system. new text end new text begin (b) The electronic credential system must be designed to comply with the most recent applicable AAMVA standards. new text end new text begin (c) DVS must adopt rules governing management and operation of an electronic credential system and for the issuance of electronic credentials. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Issuance; expiration. new text end new text begin (a) DVS may issue an electronic credential only to individuals who are otherwise eligible to hold a physical credential issued under this chapter. Data elements used to build an electronic credential must match the data in the credential holder's current DVS record. new text end new text begin (b) An electronic credential issued under this section expires according to the schedules outlined under section 171.27. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Fees. new text end new text begin DVS may charge a fee for an electronic credential in addition to the fees required under section 171.06, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Verification. new text end new text begin (a) A relying party must authenticate an electronic credential in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards, including through the use of secure encrypted communication techniques, prior to accepting an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (b) A relying party must only request electronic credential data elements necessary to complete the transaction for which that data are being requested. new text end new text begin (c) Electronic credential data is subject to chapter 13. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Privacy and tracking. new text end new text begin (a) A relying party must only retain electronic credential data elements for which the relying party explicitly obtained consent from the credential holder. A relying party must inform the credential holder of the use and retention period of electronic credential data elements. new text end new text begin (b) The electronic credential system must be designed to maximize the privacy of the credential holder in accordance with state and federal laws and must not track or compile information without the credential holder's consent. DVS must only compile or disclose information regarding use of the electronic credential as required by state or federal law. new text end new text begin Subd. 7. new text end new text begin Acceptance of electronic credentials. new text end new text begin (a) A credential holder must have a physical credential in immediate possession at all times when operating a motor vehicle under section 171.08. new text end new text begin (b) The electronic credential system must be designed so that a credential holder is not required to display or relinquish possession of a device to a relying party for the purpose of verifying and accepting an electronic credential. new text end new text begin (c) A credential holder must provide a physical credential to law enforcement upon request. new text end new text begin (d) Any law or regulation that requires a credential holder to surrender a physical credential to law enforcement does not apply to the device upon which an electronic credential has been provisioned. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2026, except that subdivision 2 is effective the day following final enactment. new text end